North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-19.1 North Dakota Business Corporation Act

10-19.1-00.1.
Citation.

This chapter may be cited as the “North Dakota Business Corporation Act”.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 101, § 1.

10-19.1-01.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Acquiring corporation” means the domestic or foreign corporation that acquires the shares of a corporation in an exchange.

“Acquiring organization” means the foreign or domestic organization acquiring the ownership interests of another foreign or domestic organization participating in an exchange.

“Address” means:

In the case of a registered office or principal executive office, the mailing address, including the zip code, of the actual office location, which may not be only a post-office box; and

In any other case, the mailing address, including the zip code.

“Articles” means:

In the case of a corporation incorporated under or governed by this chapter, articles of incorporation, articles of amendment, a resolution of election to become governed by this chapter, a demand retaining the two-thirds majority for shareholder approval of certain transactions, a statement of change of registered office, registered agent, or name of registered agent, a statement establishing or fixing the rights and preferences of a class or series of shares, a statement of cancellation of authorized shares, articles of merger, articles of abandonment, articles of conversion, and articles of dissolution.

In the case of a foreign corporation, the term includes all records serving a similar function required to be filed with the secretary of state or other officer of the state of incorporation of the foreign corporation.

“Authenticated electronic communication” means:

That the electronic communication is delivered:

To the principal place of business of the corporation; or

To an officer or agent of the corporation authorized by the corporation to receive the electronic communication; and

That the electronic communication provides information from which the corporation can reasonably conclude that the electronic communication was sent by the purported sender.

“Ballot” means a written ballot or a ballot transmitted by electronic communications.

“Board” or “board of directors” means the board of directors of a corporation.

“Board member” means:

An individual serving on the board of directors in the case of a corporation; and

An individual serving on the board of governors in the case of a limited liability company.

“Bylaws” means the code adopted for the regulation or management of the internal affairs of a corporation, regardless of how that code is designated.

“Class”, when used with reference to ownership interests, means a category of ownership interests that differs in designation or one or more rights or preferences from another category of ownership interests of the organization.

“Closely held corporation” means a corporation that does not have more than thirty-five shareholders.

“Constituent corporation” means a corporation or a foreign corporation that:

In a merger, is either the surviving corporation or a foreign or domestic corporation that is merged into the surviving organization; or

In an exchange, is either the acquiring corporation or a foreign or domestic corporation whose shares are acquired by the acquiring organization.

“Constituent organization” means an organization that:

In a merger, is either the surviving organization or an organization that is merged into the surviving organization; or

In an exchange, is either the acquiring organization or an organization whose securities are acquired by the acquiring organization.

“Converted organization” means the organization into which a converting organization converts pursuant to sections 10-19.1-104.1 through 10-19.1-104.6.

“Converting organization” means an organization that converts into another organization pursuant to sections 10-19.1-104.1 through 10-19.1-104.6.

“Corporation” or “domestic corporation” means a corporation, other than a foreign corporation, organized for profit and incorporated under or governed by this chapter.

“Data address” means the string of alphanumeric characters on a distributed or other electronic network or database which may be accessed only by knowledge or possession of a private key to facilitate or record transactions on the distributed or other electronic network or database.

“Director” means a member of the board.

“Distribution” means a direct or indirect transfer of money or other property, other than its own shares, with or without consideration, or an incurrence or issuance of indebtedness, by a corporation to any of its shareholders in respect of its shares, and may be in the form of a dividend, an interim distribution, or a distribution in liquidation, or as consideration for the purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of its shares, or otherwise.

“Division” or “combination” means dividing or combining shares of a class or series, whether issued or unissued, into a greater or lesser number of shares of the same class or series.

“Domestic organization” means an organization created under the laws of this state.

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

“Electronic communication” means any form of communication, not directly involving the physical transmission of paper, including a process of communication which uses a distributed or other electronic network or database, or that:

Creates a record that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by a recipient of the communication; and

May be directly reproduced in paper form by the recipient through an automated process.

“Electronic record” means a record created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means.

“Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a record and signed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record.

“Filed with the secretary of state” means, except as otherwise permitted by law or rule:

That a record meeting the applicable requirements of this chapter, together with the fees provided in section 10-19.1-147, was delivered or communicated to the secretary of state by a method or medium of communication acceptable by the secretary of state and was determined by the secretary of state to conform to law.

That the secretary of state did then:

Record the actual date on which the record was filed, and if different the effective date of filing; and

Record the record in the office of the secretary of state.

“Foreign corporation” means a corporation organized for profit which is incorporated under laws other than the laws of this state for a purpose for which a corporation may be incorporated under this chapter.

“Foreign limited liability company” means a limited liability company organized under laws other than the laws of this state for a purpose for which a limited liability company may be organized under chapter 10-32.1.

“Foreign organization” means an organization created under laws other than the laws of this state for a purpose for which an organization may be created under the laws of this state.

“Good faith” means honesty in fact in the conduct of an act or transaction.

“Governing body” means for an organization that is:

A corporation, its board of directors;

A limited liability company, its board of governors; or

Any other organization, the body selected by its owners that has the ultimate power to determine the policies of the organization and to control its policies.

“Governing statute” of an organization means:

With respect to a domestic organization, the following chapters of this code which govern the internal affairs of the organization:

If a corporation, then this chapter;

If a limited liability company, then chapter 10-32.1;

If a general partnership, then chapters 45-13 through 45-21;

If a limited partnership, then chapter 45-10.2;

If a limited liability partnership, then chapter 45-22; and

If a limited liability limited partnership, then chapter 45-23; and

With respect to a foreign organization, the laws of the jurisdiction under which the organization is created and under which the internal affairs of the organization are governed.

“Identity” means the name of a shareholder or the data address for which the shareholder has knowledge or possession of the private key uniquely associated with the data address.

“Intentionally” means that the person referred to has a purpose to do or fail to do the act or cause the result specified or believes that the act or failure to act, if successful, will cause that result. A person “intentionally” violates a statute:

If the person intentionally does the act or causes the result prohibited by the statute; or

If the person intentionally fails to do the act or cause the result required by the statute, even though the person may not know of the existence or constitutionality of the statute or the scope or meaning of the terms used in the statute.

“Legal representative” means a person empowered to act for another person, including an agent, a manager, an officer, a partner, or an associate of an organization; a trustee of a trust; a personal representative; a trustee in bankruptcy; and a receiver, guardian, custodian, or conservator.

“Limited liability company” or “domestic limited liability company” means a limited liability company, other than a foreign limited liability company, organized under or governed by chapter 10-32.1.

“Network signature” means a string of alphanumeric characters which when broadcasted by a shareholder to the data address’s corresponding distributed or other electronic network or database provides reasonable assurances to a corporation that the shareholder has knowledge or possession of the private key uniquely associated with the data address.

“Nonprofit corporation” means a corporation, whether domestic or foreign, incorporated under or governed by chapter 10-33.

“Notice”:

Is given by a shareholder of a corporation to the corporation or an officer of the corporation:

When in writing and mailed or delivered to the corporation or the officer at the registered office or principal executive office of the corporation; or

When given by a form of electronic communication consented to by the corporation to which the notice is given if by:

Facsimile communication, when directed to a telephone number at which the corporation has consented to receive notice.

Electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the corporation has consented to receive notice.

Posting on an electronic network on which the corporation has consented to receive notice, together with separate notice to the corporation of the specific posting, upon the later of:

The posting; or

The giving of the separate notice.

Any other form of electronic communication by which the corporation has consented to receive notice, when directed to the corporation.

Is given by a publicly held corporation to a shareholder:

If the notice is addressed to the shareholder or group of shareholders in a manner permitted by the rules and regulations under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, provided that the corporation has first received any affirmative written consent or implied consent required under those rules and regulations;

When an electronic transmission has been made to a data address provided by the shareholder; or

When electronically transmitted to the shareholder in a manner by which the shareholder has consented, when directed to the shareholder.

Is given, in all other cases:

When mailed to the person at an address designated by the person or at the last-known address of the person;

When deposited with a nationally recognized overnight delivery service for overnight delivery or, if overnight delivery to the person is not available, for delivery as promptly as practicable to the person at an address designated by the person or at the last-known address of the person;

When handed to the person;

When left at the office of the person with a clerk or other person in charge of the office or:

If there is no one in charge, when left in a conspicuous place in the office; or

If the office is closed or the person to be notified has no office, when left at the dwelling house or usual place of abode of the person with some person of suitable age and discretion then residing there;

When given by a form of electronic communication consented to by the person to whom the notice is given if by:

Facsimile communication, when directed to a telephone number at which the person has consented to receive notice.

Electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the person has consented to receive notice.

Posting on an electronic network on which the person has consented to receive notice, together with separate notice to the person of the specific posting, upon the later of:

The posting; or

The giving of the separate notice.

Any other form of electronic communication by which the person has consented to receive notice, when directed to the person; or

When the method is fair and reasonable when all of the circumstances are considered.

Is given by mail when deposited in the United States mail with sufficient postage affixed.

Is given by deposit for delivery when deposited for delivery as provided in paragraph 2 of subdivision c, after having made sufficient arrangements for payment by the sender.

Is deemed received when it is given.

“Officer” means an individual who is eighteen years of age or more who is:

Elected, appointed, or otherwise designated as the president, the treasurer, or any other officer pursuant to section 10-19.1-52; or

Deemed elected as an officer pursuant to section 10-19.1-56.

“Organization”:

Means, whether domestic or foreign, a corporation, limited liability company, general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability limited partnership, or any other person subject to a governing statute; but

Excludes:

A nonprofit corporation, whether a domestic nonprofit corporation which is incorporated under chapter 10-33 or a foreign nonprofit corporation which is incorporated in another jurisdiction; and

A nonprofit limited liability company, whether a domestic nonprofit limited liability company which is organized under chapter 10-36 or a foreign nonprofit limited liability company which is organized in another jurisdiction.

“Originating records” means for an organization that is:

A corporation, its articles of incorporation;

A limited liability company, its articles of organization;

A limited partnership, its certificate of limited partnership;

A limited liability partnership, its registration; or

A limited liability limited partnership, its certificate of limited liability limited partnership.

“Outstanding shares” means all shares duly issued and not reacquired by a corporation.

“Owners” means the holders of ownership interests in an organization.

“Ownership interests” means for a domestic or foreign organization that is:

A corporation, its shares;

A limited liability company, its membership interests;

A limited partnership, its partnership interests;

A general partnership, its partnership interests;

A limited liability partnership, its partnership interests;

A limited liability limited partnership, its partnership interests; or

Any other organization, its governance or transferable interests.

“Parent” of a specified organization means an organization that directly, or indirectly through related organizations, owns more than fifty percent of the voting power of the ownership interests entitled to vote for directors or other members of the governing body of the specified organization.

“Principal executive office” means:

If the corporation has an elected or appointed president, then an office where the elected or appointed president of a corporation has an office; or

If the corporation has no elected or appointed president, then the registered office of the corporation.

“Publicly held corporation” means a corporation that has a class of equity securities registered pursuant to section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 [15 U.S.C. 78L], or is subject to section 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 [15 U.S.C. 78o(d)].

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Record of shareholders” means a record administered by or on behalf of a corporation and which records the identity of all the corporation’s shareholders and the number and class of shares held by each shareholder in accordance with section 10-19.1-84. The term includes a record of all issuances and transfers of shares of a corporation at the discretion of the corporation;

“Registered office” means the place in this state designated in a corporation’s articles of incorporation or in a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority as the registered office.

“Related organization” means an organization that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another organization with control existing if an organization:

Owns, directly or indirectly, at least fifty percent of the ownership interests of another organization;

Has the right, directly or indirectly, to elect, appoint, or remove fifty percent or more of the voting members of the governing body of another organization; or

Has the power, directly or indirectly, to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of another organization, whether through the ownership of voting interests, by contract, or otherwise.

“Remote communication” means communication via electronic communication, conference telephone, videoconference, the internet, or such other means by which persons not physically present in the same location may communicate with each other on a substantially simultaneous basis.

“Security” has the meaning given in section 10-04-02.

“Series” means a category of shares, within a class of shares authorized or issued by a corporation by or pursuant to a corporation’s articles, that have some of the same rights and preferences as other shares within the same class, but that differ in designation or one or more rights and preferences from another category of shares within that class.

“Share” means one of the units, however designated, into which the shareholders’ proprietary interests of the shareholder in a corporation are divided.

“Shareholder” means a person registered on the books or records of a corporation or the corporation’s transfer agent or registrar as the owner of whole or fractional shares of the corporation or the owner of a private key uniquely associated with a data address that facilitates or records the sending and receiving of shares.

“Signed” means:

That the signature of a person, which may be a facsimile affixed, engraved, by network signature, printed, placed, stamped with indelible ink, transmitted by facsimile telecommunication or electronically, or in any other manner reproduced on the record, is placed on a record with the present intention to authenticate that record; and

With respect to a record required by this chapter to be filed with the secretary of state, that:

The record is signed by a person authorized to do so by this chapter, the articles or bylaws, or a resolution approved by the directors as required under section 10-19.1-46 or the shareholders as required under section 10-19.1-74; and

The signature and the record are communicated by a method or medium of communication acceptable by the secretary of state.

“Subscriber” means a person that subscribes for shares in a corporation, whether before or after incorporation.

“Subsidiary” of a specified organization means an organization having more than fifty percent of the voting power of its ownership interests entitled to vote for directors, governors, or other members of the governing body of the organization owned directly, or indirectly, through related organizations, by the specified organization.

“Surviving corporation” means the domestic or foreign corporation resulting from a merger which:

May pre-exist the merger; or

May be created by the merger.

“Surviving organization” means the organization resulting from a merger which:

May pre-exist the merger; or

May be created by the merger.

“Vote” includes authorization by written action.

“Written action” means:

A written record signed by all of the persons required to take the action; or

The counterparts of a written record signed by any of the persons taking the action described.

Each counterpart constitutes the action of the person signing; and

All the counterparts, taken together, constitute one written action by all of the persons signing the counterparts.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1991, ch. 98, § 6; 1993, ch. 54, § 3; 1995, ch. 55, § 4; 1995, ch. 103, § 4; 1997, ch. 103, § 2; 1999, ch. 95, § 5; 2001, ch. 112, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 1; 2005, ch. 100, § 1; 2007, ch. 101, § 2; 2007, ch. 354, § 3; 2009, ch. 106, §
6; 2011, ch. 87, § 9; 2013, ch. 89, § 4; 2015, ch. 87, § 6, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 94, § 5, effective August 1, 2019.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-02.

10-19.1-01.1.
Legal recognition of electronic records and electronic signatures.

For purposes of this chapter:

A record or signature may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because it is in electronic form;

A contract may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because an electronic record was used in its formation;

If a provision requires a record to be in writing, an electronic record satisfies the requirement; and

If a provision requires a signature, an electronic signature satisfies the requirement.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 85, § 2.

10-19.1-01.2.
Knowledge and notice.

A person knows or has knowledge of a fact if the person has actual knowledge of it. A person does not know or have knowledge of a fact merely because the person has reason to know or have knowledge of the fact.

A person has notice of a fact if the person:

Knows of the fact;

Has received notice of the fact as provided in subsection 39 of section 10-19.1-01;

Has reason to know the fact exists from all of the facts known to the person at the time in question; or

Has notice of it under subsection 3.

Subject to subsection 8, a person has notice of:

The intention of a corporation to dissolve, ninety days after the effective date of the filed notice of intent to dissolve;

The dissolution of a corporation, ninety days after the effective date of the filed articles of dissolution;

The conversion of a corporation, ninety days after the effective date of the filed articles of conversion; or

The merger of a corporation, ninety days after the effective date of the filed articles of merger.

A person notifies or gives a notification to another person by taking the steps provided in subsection 39 of section 10-19.1-01, whether or not the other person learns of it.

A person receives a notification as provided in subsection 39 of section 10-19.1-01.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7 and except as otherwise provided in subsection 39 of section 10-19.1-01, a person other than an individual knows, has notice, or receives a notification of a fact for purposes of a particular transaction when the individual conducting the transaction for the person knows, has notice, or receives a notification of the fact, or in any event when the fact would have been brought to the attention of the individual if the person had exercised reasonable diligence.

A person other than an individual exercises reasonable diligence if it maintains reasonable routines for communicating significant information to the individual conducting the transaction for the person and there is reasonable compliance with the routines.

Reasonable diligence does not require an individual acting for the person to communicate information unless the communication is part of the regular duties of the individual or the individual has reason to know of the transaction and that the transaction would be materially affected by the information.

Knowledge, notice, or receipt of a notification of a fact relating to the corporation by an officer or director is effective immediately as knowledge of, notice to, or receipt of a notification by the corporation, except in the case of a fraud on the corporation committed by or with the consent of the officer or director. Knowledge, notice, or receipt of a notification of a fact relating to the corporation by a shareholder who is not an officer or director, is not effective as knowledge by, notice to, or receipt of a notification by the corporation.

Notice otherwise effective under subsection 3 does not affect the power of a person to transfer real property held in the name of a corporation unless at the time of transfer a certified copy of the relevant statement, amendment, or articles, as filed with the secretary of state, has been recorded in the office of the county recorder in the county in which the real property affected by the statement, amendment, or articles is located.

With respect to notice given by a form of electronic communication:

Consent by an officer or director to notice given by electronic communication may be given in writing or by authenticated electronic communication. The corporation is entitled to rely on any consent so given until revoked by the officer or director. However, no revocation affects the validity of any notice given before receipt by the corporation of revocation of the consent.

An affidavit of an officer or director or an authorized agent of the corporation, that the notice has been given by a form of electronic communication is, in the absence of fraud, prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the affidavit.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 2; 2007, ch. 101, § 3; 2019, ch. 94, § 6, effective August 1, 2019.

10-19.1-02.
Application to corporations incorporated after June 30, 1985.

This chapter applies to all corporations for profit incorporated for a purpose or purposes for which a corporation might be incorporated under this chapter or which are incorporated under chapters 6-05, 10-06.1, 10-30, 10-31, 26-08, or any other chapter which provides that such corporations are governed by the general corporation laws of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

Note.

Chapter 26-08 referred to in this section is repealed. For present provisions, see ch. 26.1-05.

10-19.1-02.1.
Reservation of legislative right.

The legislative assembly reserves the right to amend or repeal the provisions of this chapter. A corporation incorporated under or governed by this chapter is subject to this reserved right.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 101, § 4.

10-19.1-03.
Election prior to mandatory application. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 50, § 79.

10-19.1-04.
Mandatory application.

After June 30, 1986, this chapter applies to all existing corporations incorporated under any chapter of this code providing for the incorporation of corporations for a purpose or purposes for which a corporation might be incorporated under this chapter or which are otherwise to be governed by the general corporation laws of this state.

All provisions of the articles and bylaws of the corporation that may be included in the articles or bylaws under this chapter remain in effect. All provisions of the articles and bylaws of the corporation that are inconsistent with this chapter cease to be effective on July 1, 1986. Any provisions required by this chapter to be contained in the articles that do not appear in the articles are read into them as a matter of law.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

10-19.1-05.
Retention of two-thirds majority.

If the articles of a corporation described in section 10-19.1-02 do not contain a provision specifying the proportion of the voting power of the shares required for approval of amendments to the articles, plans of merger or exchange, or sales of assets, a shareholder or shareholders holding more than one-third of the voting power of all the shares entitled to vote for any or all of the above-mentioned actions, by signed written demand filed in duplicate original with the secretary of state, along with the fees provided in section 10-19.1-147, may amend the articles of the corporation to include a provision requiring the approval of the holders of two-thirds of the voting power of the shares entitled to vote for any or all of the above-mentioned actions for which no required majority was specified, notwithstanding any provisions of section 10-19.1-19, 10-19.1-98, or 10-19.1-104 to the contrary. Notice that the demand has been filed must be given by the shareholder to an officer of the corporation, but failure to give the notice does not invalidate the demand.

A shareholder or shareholders holding more than one-third of the voting power of the shares entitled to vote for dissolution of a corporation described in section 10-19.1-02, by signed written demand filed in duplicate original with the secretary of state, along with the fees provided in section 10-19.1-147, may amend the articles of the corporation to include a provision requiring the approval of the holders of two-thirds of the voting power of all the shares for the authorization of the dissolution of the corporation, notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-19.1-107. Notice that the demand was filed must be given by the shareholder to an officer of the corporation, but failure to give the notice does not invalidate the demand.

A signed written demand by the shareholders of a corporation pursuant to subsection 1 or 2 is valid only if filed with the secretary of state before July 1, 1986.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1999, ch. 50, § 8; 1999, ch. 95, § 6; 2001, ch. 55, § 5.

10-19.1-06.
Transition.

The continuation or completion of any act by a corporation that has not incorporated under, but has become governed by, this chapter, and the continuation or performance of any executed or wholly or partially executory contract, conveyance, or transfer to or by the corporation, if otherwise lawful before the corporation became governed by this chapter, remains valid, and may be continued, completed, consummated, enforced, or terminated as required or permitted by a statute applicable prior to the date on which the corporation became governed by this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

10-19.1-07.
Reservation of legislative power. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 30.

10-19.1-08.
Purposes.

A corporation may be incorporated under this chapter for any lawful business purpose or purposes, unless some other statute of this state requires incorporation for any of those purposes under a different law. Unless otherwise provided in its articles, a corporation has general business purposes.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 2005, ch. 100, § 3.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-03.

Cross-References.

Annuity companies, organization, see N.D.C.C. ch. 6-05.

Banks, organization, see N.D.C.C. ch. 6-02.

Benevolent societies, see N.D.C.C. ch. 26.1-16.

Farming, restrictions on corporations engaging in agriculture or owning agricultural land, see N.D.C.C. ch. 10-06.1.

Irrigation corporations, see N.D.C.C. ch. 61-13.

Safe deposit companies, organization, see N.D.C.C. ch. 6-05.

Stock insurance companies, organization, see N.D.C.C. § 26.1-05-02.

Surety companies, organization, see N.D.C.C. ch. 6-05.

Trust companies, organization, see N.D.C.C. ch. 6-05.

Collateral References.

Applicability of statutes regulating sale of assets of corporation or property of corporation as affected by purpose or character of corporation, 9 A.L.R.2d 1306.

10-19.1-09.
Incorporators.

One or more individuals of the age of eighteen years or more may act as incorporators of a corporation by filing with the secretary of state articles of incorporation for the corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-52.

Collateral References.

Rights and liabilities of promoters or incorporators inter se under their contract for issuance of stock to them in return for services, 8 A.L.R.2d 722.

Personal liability of promoter to third person on or with respect to contract made for corporation or in aid of promotion, 41 A.L.R.2d 477.

Validity and construction of preincorporation agreement between promoters as to future employment, 66 A.L.R.3d 1138.